Maryland, session 2025, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
12–104.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated],
“HOUSING AUTHORITY ENTITY” MEANS AN ENTITY:
[(2) “Baltimore Housing Authority entity” means an entity:
(i) that is controlled or wholly owned by the Housing Authority of
Baltimore City; or
(ii) in which the Housing Authority of Baltimore City or an entity
controlled or wholly owned by the Housing Authority of Baltimore City has an ownership
interest, either directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned
subsidiary entities.
– 1 –

Ch. 169 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “Howard County Housing Commission entity” means an entity:
(i) that is controlled or wholly owned by the Howard County
Housing Commission; or
(ii) in which the Howard County Housing Commission or an entity
controlled or wholly owned by the Howard County Housing Commission has an ownership
interest, either directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned
subsidiary entities.
(4) “Montgomery County Housing Authority entity” means an entity that
is controlled or wholly owned by the Housing Opportunities Commission of Montgomery
County.]
(1) THAT IS CONTROLLED OR WHOLLY OWNED BY AN AUTHORITY; OR
(2) IN WHICH AN AUTHORITY OR AN ENTITY CONTROLLED OR WHOLLY
OWNED BY AN AUTHORITY HAS AN OWNERSHIP INTEREST, EITHER DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, THROUGH ONE OR MORE WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY
ENTITIES.
(b) [(1)] A nonprofit entity shall be deemed controlled by [the Housing Authority
of Baltimore City] AN AUTHORITY under subsection [(a)(2)] (A) of this section if:
[(i) the nonprofit entity is established by the Housing Authority of
Baltimore City under § 12–502(h) of this title; and
(ii) the Housing Authority of Baltimore City:
1. has the power to appoint a majority of the board of
directors of the nonprofit entity; or
2. is the sole member of the nonprofit entity.
(2) A nonprofit entity shall be deemed controlled by the Howard County
Housing Commission under subsection (a)(3) of this section if:
(i) the nonprofit entity is established by the Howard County
Housing Commission under § 12–502(h) of this title; and
(ii) the Howard County Housing Commission:
1. has the power to appoint a majority of the board of
directors of the nonprofit entity; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 169
2. is the sole member of the nonprofit entity.
(3) A nonprofit entity shall be deemed controlled by the Housing
Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County under subsection (a)(4) of this section if:
(i) the nonprofit entity is established by the Housing Opportunities
Commission of Montgomery County under § 12–502(h) of this title; and
(ii) the Housing Opportunities Commission of Montgomery County:
1. has the power to appoint a majority of the board of
directors of the nonprofit entity;
2. holds a majority of all managing member interests in the
entity;
3. holds a majority of the general partner interests in the
entity; or
4. holds a majority of all ownership interests in the entity.]
(1) THE NONPROFIT ENTITY IS ESTABLISHED BY AN AUTHORITY
UNDER § 12–502(H) OF THIS TITLE; AND
(2) THE AUTHORITY:
(I) HAS THE POWER TO APPOINT A MAJORITY OF THE BOARD OF
DIRECTORS OF THE NONPROFIT ENTITY; OR
(II) IS THE SOLE MEMBER OF THE NONPROFIT ENTITY.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “nonprofit housing corporation” means a nonprofit
or charitable private corporation that provides safe and sanitary housing to persons of
eligible income in such a way that the corporation works essentially like an authority under
this Division II.
(2) Property is used for essential public and governmental purposes and is
exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the State or a political subdivision if the
property:
(i) belongs to an authority or a nonprofit housing corporation; [or
(ii) is used as housing for persons of eligible income and is owned in
whole or in part, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned
subsidiary entities of a Baltimore Housing Authority entity; or
– 3 –

Ch. 169 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) 1. is used, or if under construction will be used, as housing
for persons of eligible income and is owned in whole or in part, directly or indirectly,
through one or more wholly or partially owned subsidiary entities of a Howard County
Housing Commission entity;
2. has improvements, or has improvements under
construction, located on land that is owned by:
A. the Howard County Housing Commission; or
B. an entity that is controlled or wholly owned by the Howard
County Housing Commission; and
3. has improvements, or has improvements under
construction, owned by an entity:
A. for which the Howard County Housing Commission
publicly solicited development partners pursuant to its procurement policies; or
B. that has a general partner or managing member that is
controlled or wholly owned by the Howard County Housing Commission; or
(iv) is used as housing for persons of eligible income and is owned by
a Montgomery County Housing Authority entity.]
(II) IS USED AS HOUSING FOR PERSONS OF ELIGIBLE INCOME
AND IS OWNED IN WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THROUGH ONE OR
MORE WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY ENTITIES OF A HOUSING
AUTHORITY ENTITY; OR
(III) 1. IS USED, OR IF PLANNED OR UNDER CONSTRUCTION
WILL BE USED, AS HOUSING FOR PERSONS OF ELIGIBLE INCOME AND IS OWNED IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THROUGH ONE OR MORE WHOLLY
OR PARTIALLY OWNED SUBSIDIARY ENTITIES OF A HOUSING AUTHORITY ENTITY;
AND
2. HAS IMPROVEMENTS, OR HAS IMPROVEMENTS
PLANNED OR UNDER CONSTRUCTION, LOCATED ON LAND THAT IS OWNED BY:
A. AN AUTHORITY; OR
B. AN ENTITY THAT IS CONTROLLED OR WHOLLY OWNED
BY AN AUTHORITY.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 169
(3) In lieu of those taxes and special assessments, an authority, a nonprofit
housing corporation, [a Baltimore Housing Authority entity, a Howard County Housing
Commission entity, or a Montgomery County Housing Authority entity] OR A HOUSING
AUTHORITY ENTITY shall pay the political subdivision in which a housing project is wholly
or partly located an amount, if any, that may be set by mutual agreement and that does
not exceed the amount of regular taxes levied on similar property.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection:
(i) all real property of an authority is exempt from levy and sale by
virtue of an execution;
(ii) an execution or other judicial process may not issue against the
real property; and
(iii) a judgment against an authority is not a charge or lien on the
authority’s real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not limit a right to foreclose or
otherwise enforce:
(i) a mortgage or deed of trust recorded against property of an
authority; or
(ii) a pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees, or
revenues.
(3) This subsection does not deprive a political subdivision of its right to
collect money agreed to be paid in lieu of taxes in the same manner as taxes are now or may
be collected under State law and the laws of the political subdivision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 5 –